District of Columbia statutes.
16-4603.14

Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from a final order in a proceeding under this subchapter. The appeal shall be considered on an expedited basis. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order under section 16-4602.04 , the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child-custody determination pending appeal.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 314 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).